Vermont, session 2025-2026, S191.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 2795 is amended to read:
§ 2795. EFFICIENCY AND WATER CONSERVATION STANDARDS
(a) The Commissioner shall adopt rules in accordance with the provisions
of 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 establishing minimum efficiency standards for the types
of new products set forth in section 2794 of this title. The rules shall provide
for the following minimum efficiency standards for products sold or installed
in this State:
(1) Medium voltage dry-type distribution transformers shall at a
minimum meet the efficiency requirements set forth for such transformers in
VT LEG #385140 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.191
2026 Page 2 of 12
10 C.F.R. § 431.196, as those requirements may be amended from time to
time.
(2) Metal halide lamp fixtures designed to be operated with lamps rated
greater than or equal to 150 watts but less than or equal to 500 watts shall not
contain a probe-start metal halide ballast.
(3)(A) Residential furnaces and residential boilers shall meet or exceed
the following Annual Fuel Utilization Efficiency (AFUE) and electricity ratio
values:
Product Type Maximum Maximum
AFUE electricity
ratio
Natural gas- and propane-
fired furnaces 90% 2.0%
Oil-fired furnaces ≥ 94,000
Btus/hour in capacity 83% 2.0%
Oil-fired furnaces < 94,000
Btus/hour in capacity 83% 2.3%
Natural gas-, oil-, and
propane-fired hot water
residential boilers 84% Not applicable
VT LEG #385140 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.191
2026 Page 3 of 12
Natural gas-, oil-,
and propane-fired steam
residential boilers 82% Not applicable
(B) AFUE shall be measured in accordance with the federal test
method for measuring the energy consumption of furnaces and boilers
contained in Appendix N to subpart B of part 430, Title 10, Code of Federal
Regulations.
(C) The Commissioner may adopt rules to exempt compliance with
these residential furnace or residential boiler AFUE standards at any building,
site, or location where complying with these standards would be in conflict
with any local zoning ordinance, building or plumbing code, or other rule
regarding installation and venting of residential boilers or residential furnaces.
(4)(A) Single-voltage external AC to DC power supplies shall meet the
energy efficiency requirements of the following table:
Nameplate output power Minimum efficiency in Active Mode
0 to < 1 watt 0.49* Nameplate Output
≥ 1 watt and ≤ 49 watts 0.09*Ln(Nameplate Output power) + 0.49
> 49 watts 0.84
Maximum Energy Consumption in
No-Load Mode
0 to < 10 watts 0.5 watts
VT LEG #385140 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.191
2026 Page 4 of 12
≥ 10 watts and ≤ 250 watts 0.75 watts
* Where Ln (Nameplate Output) = Natural logarithm of the nameplate output
expressed in watts.
(B) This standard applies to single voltage AC to DC power supplies
that are sold individually and to those that are sold as a component of or in
conjunction with another product. Single voltage AC to DC power supplies
that are made available by a product manufacturer as accessories, service parts,
or spare parts for its products manufactured prior to January 1, 2008 shall be
exempt from the requirements of this standard.
(C) For purposes of this subdivision (4), the efficiency of single-
voltage external AC to DC power supplies shall be measured in accordance
with the test methodology specified by the ENERGY STAR Program, “Test
Method for Calculating the Energy Efficiency of Single-Voltage External AC-
DC and AC-AC Power Supplies (August 11, 2004).”
(5)(A) State-regulated incandescent reflector lamps shall meet the
minimum average lamp efficacy requirements for federally regulated
incandescent reflector lamps contained in 42 U.S.C. § 6295(i)(1)(A).
(B) The following types of incandescent reflector lamps are exempt
from these requirements:
(i) lamps rated at 50 watts or less of the following types: BR30,
ER30, BR40, and ER40;
VT LEG #385140 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.191
2026 Page 5 of 12
(ii) lamps rated at 65 watts of the following types: BR30, BR40,
and ER40; and
(iii) R20 lamps of 45 watts or less.
(6) In the rules, the Commissioner shall adopt minimum efficiency and
water conservation standards for each product that is subject to a standard
under 10 C.F.R. §§ 430 and 431 as those provisions existed on January 19,
2017 2025. The minimum standard and the testing protocol for each product
shall be the same as adopted in those sections of the Code of Federal
Regulations, except that for faucets, showerheads, and urinals, the minimum
standard and testing protocol shall be as otherwise set forth in this section.
(7) In the rules, the Commissioner shall adopt a minimum efficacy
standard for general service lamps of 45 lumens per watt, when tested in
accordance with 10 C.F.R. § 430.23(gg) as that provision existed on January
19, 2017.
(8) In this subdivision (8), “final rule” means the document setting forth
a final action by the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) with respect to a final
rule for “Energy Conservation Standards for Air Compressors,” docket no.
EERE-2013-BT-STD-0040, approved by DOE on December 5, 2016. Air
compressors that meet the 12 criteria to be codified under 10 C.F.R. §
431.345(a) and set forth on pages 350 to 351 of the final rule shall meet the
requirements contained in Table 1 on page 352 of the final rule using the
VT LEG #385140 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.191
2026 Page 6 of 12
instructions to be codified under 10 C.F.R. § 431.345(b) and set forth on page
353 of the final rule. Compliance with these requirements shall be measured in
accordance with 10 C.F.R. Part 431, Subpart T, Appendix A, entitled “Uniform
Test Method for Certain Air Compressors,” as in effect on July 3, 2017.
(9)(2) Commercial dishwashers included in the scope of the “ENERGY
STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial
Dishwashers,” Version 2.0, shall meet the qualification criteria of that
specification.
(10)(3) Commercial fryers included in the scope of the “ENERGY
STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Fryers,”
Version 2.0, shall meet the qualification criteria of that specification.
(11)(4) Commercial hot-food holding cabinets shall have a maximum
idle energy rate of 40 watts per cubic foot of interior volume, as determined by
the “idle energy rate-dry test” in ASTM F2140-11, “Standard Test Method for
Performance of Hot-Food Holding Cabinets,” ASTM International (2011).
Interior volume shall be measured as prescribed in the “ENERGY STAR
Program Requirements Product Specification for Commercial Hot-Food
Holding Cabinets,” Version 2.0.
(12)(5) Commercial steam cookers shall meet the requirements of the
“ENERGY STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for
Commercial Steam Cookers,” Version 1.2.
VT LEG #385140 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.191
2026 Page 7 of 12
(13)(6) Computers and computer monitors shall meet the requirements
of 20 California Code of Regulations (C.C.R.) § 1605.3(v) and compliance
with these requirements shall be measured in accordance with test methods
prescribed in 20 C.C.R. § 1604(v).
(A) For the purposes of this subdivision (13)(6), terms used in the
referenced portions of the C.C.R. shall be as defined in 20 C.C.R. § 1602.
(B) The rules shall define “computer” and “computer monitor” to
have the same meaning as set forth in 20 C.C.R. § 1602(v).
(C) The referenced portions of the C.C.R. shall be those adopted on
or before July 1, 2018. However, the Commissioner shall have authority to
amend the rules so that the definitions of “computer” and “computer monitor”
and the minimum efficiency standards for computers and computer monitors
conform to subsequently adopted modifications to the referenced sections of
the C.C.R.
(14)(7) Faucets, except for metering faucets, and showerheads shall
meet the standards set forth in this subdivision (14)(7) when tested in
accordance with 10 C.F.R. Part 430, Subpart B, Appendix S, entitled “Uniform
Test Method for Measuring the Water Consumption of Faucets and
Showerheads,” as in effect on January 3, 2017.
VT LEG #385140 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.191
2026 Page 8 of 12
(A) Lavatory faucets and replacement aerators shall not exceed a
maximum flow rate of 1.5 gallons per minute (gpm) at 60 pounds per square
inch (psi).
(B) Residential kitchen faucets and replacement aerators shall not
exceed a maximum flow rate of 1.8 gpm at 60 psi, with optional temporary
flow of 2.2 gpm, provided they default to a maximum flow rate of 1.8 gpm at
60 psi after each use.
(C) Public lavatory faucets and replacement aerators shall not exceed
a maximum flow rate of 0.5 gpm at 60 psi.
(D) Showerheads shall not exceed a maximum flow rate of 2.0 gpm
at 80 psi.
(15) High CRI fluorescent lamps shall meet the minimum efficacy
requirements contained in 10 C.F.R. § 430.32(n)(4) as that subdivision existed
on January 3, 2017. Compliance with requirements shall be measured in
accordance with 10 C.F.R. Part 430, Subpart B, Appendix R, entitled
“Uniform Test Method for Measuring Average Lamp Efficacy (LE), Color
Rendering Index (CRI), and Correlated Color Temperature (CCT) of Electric
Lamps,” as that appendix existed on January 3, 2017.
(16)(8) Urinals, other than trough-type urinals and urinals designed and
marketed exclusively for use at prisons or mental health facilities, shall have a
maximum flush volume of 0.5 gallons per flush when tested in accordance
VT LEG #385140 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.191
2026 Page 9 of 12
with 10 C.F.R. Part 430, Subpart B, Appendix T, entitled “Uniform Test
Method for Measuring the Water Consumption of Water Closets and Urinals,”
as in effect on January 3, 2017, and shall pass the waste extraction test for
water closets set forth in Sec. 7.10 of the American Society of Mechanical
Engineers (ASME) standard A112.19.2-2013/CSA B.45.1, as that standard
exists on July 1, 2018.
(17) Portable air conditioners shall have a Combined Energy Efficiency
Ratio (CEER), that is greater than or equal to: 1.04 x [SACC/(3.7177 x
SACC0.638/f4)].
(A) In this subdivision (17), “SACC” means seasonally adjusted
cooling capacity expressed in British thermal units per hour.
(B) The CEER shall be measured in accordance with 10 C.F.R. Part
430, Subpart B, Appendix CC, entitled “Uniform Test Method for Measuring
the Energy Consumption of Portable Air Conditioners,” as in effect on January
3, 2017.
(18)(9) Portable electric spas shall meet the requirements of the
American National Standard for Portable Electric Spa Energy Efficiency,
ANSI/APSP/ICC-14 2014, as that standard exists on July 1, 2018.
(19)(10) Residential ventilating fans shall meet the qualification criteria
of the “ENERGY STAR Program Requirements Product Specification for
Residential Ventilating Fans,” Version 3.2.
VT LEG #385140 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.191
2026 Page 10 of 12
(20)(11) Spray sprinkler bodies shall include an integral pressure
regulator and shall meet the water efficiency and performance criteria and
other requirements of the Environmental Protection Agency’s “WaterSense
Specification for Spray Sprinkler Bodies,” Version 1.0. However, this
subdivision (20)(11) shall not apply to spray sprinkler bodies that are
specifically excluded from the scope of that specification.
(21) In this subdivision (21), “final rule” means the document setting
forth a final action by DOE with respect to a final rule for “Energy
Conservation Standards for Uninterruptible Power Supplies,” docket no.
EERE-2016-BT-STD-0022, approved by DOE on December 28, 2016.
Uninterruptible power supplies that use a National Electrical Manufacturer
Association (NEMA) 1-15P or 5-15P input plug and have an alternating
current (AC) output shall have an average load-adjusted efficiency that meets
or exceed the values shown to be codified under 10 C.F.R. § 430.32(z)(3) and
set forth on pages 193-194 of the final rule. Compliance with these
requirements shall be measured in accordance with 10 C.F.R. Part 430, Subpart
B, Appendix Y, entitled “Uniform Test Method for Measuring the Energy
Consumption of Battery Chargers,” as in effect on January 11, 2017.
(22)(12) Water coolers included in the scope of the “ENERGY STAR
Program Requirements Product Specification for Water Coolers,” Version 2.0,
shall have “on mode with no water draw” energy consumption less than or
VT LEG #385140 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.191
2026 Page 11 of 12
equal to the following values, measured in accordance with the test
requirements of that specification:
(A) 0.16 kilowatt-hours (kWh) per day for cold-only units and cook
and cold units;
(B) 0.87 kWh per day for storage type hot and cold units; and
(C) 0.18 kWh per day for on-demand hot and cold units.
(b) When a minimum efficiency standard as described in subsection (a) of
this section sets forth requirements that change over time, the rules shall
provide for compliance with the changed requirements as they come into
effect.
(c) When a subdivision within subdivisions (a)(8)(2) through (a)(22)(12) of
this section requires compliance with an efficiency standard or testing protocol
contained in a document issued by an agency of the United States, another
state, or a nationally or internationally recognized organization, the rules of the
Commissioner may incorporate the specified standard or protocol by reference
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 838 rather than setting forth its language.
(d) With respect to computers and computer monitors subject to
subdivision (a)(13)(6) of this section, the Commissioner shall have authority to
adopt official interpretations of the applicable efficiency standards published
by the staff of the California Energy Commission (CEC). The rules shall state
VT LEG #385140 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.191
2026 Page 12 of 12
the process for such adoption and the manner in which the Commissioner will
make the adopted interpretations publicly available.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385140 v.1